Utah statutes.
16-15-108.   When amendments are required.

(1)  An amended certificate shall be filed with the division not later than 30 days after any change in:

(a)  any person acting as a trustee of the trust, or the address of any trustee;

(b)  the registered agent of the trust;

(c)  the registered office of the business trust; or

(d)  in any information required to be filed with the division under this chapter.

(2)  The amended certificate shall be signed by each trustee of the business trust and filed in the same manner as a certificate of registration under Section 16-15-105.

(3)  The division may charge a fee in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for amending a certificate of registration.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

